Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 90 Medical School Authorities Act of 2010
7-90-115. Powers of municipalities to aid or assist authorities.

Any municipality is authorized to aid or otherwise provide assistance to an authority created pursuant to this chapter by such municipality, including entering into leases of projects, or parts of projects with an authority, for such term or terms and upon such conditions as may be determined by the governing body of such municipality, notwithstanding and without regard to the restrictions, prohibitions, or requirements of any other law, whether public or private, or granting, contributing or pledging revenues of the municipality to or for the benefit of the authority derived from any source.

The governing body of any municipality, by resolution, may designate the authority to be the recipient of funds of the state or the municipality, when such funds are allocated or directed for use in connection with the construction, improvement, financing or operation of facilities. The municipality may take such actions as may be necessary to cause any such funds to be paid to the authority, and the municipality and the authority may enter into any and all agreements as may be necessary to provide for the payment of the authority's bonds out of such funds, as described in § 7-90-112(g).

The governing body of any municipality, by resolution, may cause any departments, instrumentalities or organizations formed by the municipality to be joined with and into the authority, and may take such steps as may be necessary to cause the assets, liabilities and operations of any such organizations to be transferred to the authority.

Acts 2010, ch. 1078, § 1.

7-90-116. Execution of leases, contracts, deeds, instruments in writing.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, all leases, contracts, deeds of conveyance, or instruments in writing executed by the authority, shall be executed in the name of the authority by the chair or secretary of the authority, or by such other officers as the board of directors, by resolution, may direct, and the seal of the authority may be affixed to such instruments.

Acts 2010, ch. 1078, § 1.

7-90-117. Nonprofit corporation — Disposition of earnings.

The authority shall be a public nonprofit corporation and no part of its net earnings remaining after payment of its expenses shall inure to the benefit of any individual, firm or corporation, except that in the event the board of directors shall determine that sufficient provision has been made for the full payment of the expenses, bonds and other obligations of the authority, including reserves for the expenses, bonds and other obligations; any net earnings of the authority thereafter accruing may be used to provide a reserve for depreciation of any project or projects undertaken by such authority, in an amount determined by the board of directors to be necessary and reasonable, and net earnings available thereafter shall be paid to the municipality with respect to which the authority was organized; provided, that nothing contained in this section shall prevent the board of directors from transferring all or any part of its properties in accordance with the terms of any lease entered into by the authority; provided further, that in no event shall such transfer inure to the benefit of a private entity.

Acts 2010, ch. 1078, § 1.

7-90-118. Completion of corporate purpose — Dissolution.

If the board of directors of an authority or the governing body of the creating municipality by resolution determines that the purposes for which the authority was formed have been substantially accomplished and all bonds theretofore issued and all obligations theretofore incurred by the authority have been fully paid, then the members of the board of directors or the executive officers of the municipality, as the case may be, shall thereupon execute and file for record in the office of the secretary of state a certificate of dissolution, reciting such facts and declaring the authority to be dissolved. Such certificate of dissolution shall be executed under the seal of the authority. Upon the filing of such certificate of dissolution, the authority shall stand dissolved; the title to all funds and properties owned by it at the time of such dissolution shall vest in the municipality with respect to which the authority was organized, and possession of such funds and properties shall forthwith be delivered to such municipality.

Acts 2010, ch. 1078, § 1.

7-90-119. Joint operation.

The powers conferred upon authorities created under this chapter may be exercised by two (2) or more such authorities acting jointly.

Two (2) or more municipalities may, by acting jointly, incorporate a medical school authority to effectuate the purposes of this chapter. When two (2) or more municipalities incorporate such an authority, each and every requisite pertaining to the application for incorporation, qualification of applicants, charter and amendment of charter shall, as nearly as may be practicable, be incumbent in like manner upon each municipality joining in the creation of such authority.

Acts 2010, ch. 1078, § 1.

7-90-120. Acquisition of project sites.

Any municipality may acquire a project site by gift, purchase or lease, or exercise of the power of eminent domain, and may transfer any project site to an authority by sale, lease or gift. Such transfer may be authorized by a resolution of the governing body of the municipality without submission of the question to the voters, and without regard to the requirements, restrictions, limitations or other provisions contained in any other general, special or local law.

Acts 2010, ch. 1078, § 1.

7-90-121. Construction of chapter — Powers not restricted.

This chapter shall not be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any powers that an authority, as a public corporation, might otherwise have under any laws of this state, but shall be construed as cumulative of any such powers. No proceedings, notice or approval shall be required for the organization of the authority or the issuance of any bonds or any instrument as security for the bonds, except as provided in this chapter, any other law to the contrary notwithstanding; provided, that nothing in this chapter shall be construed to deprive the state and its governmental subdivisions of their respective police powers over properties of the authority, or to impair any power over properties of the authority of any official or agency of the state and its governmental subdivisions that may be otherwise provided by law. Projects may be acquired, purchased, constructed, reconstructed, improved, bettered and extended, and bonds may be issued under this chapter for such purposes, notwithstanding that any other general, special or local law may provide for the acquisition, purchase, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment and extension of a like project, or the issuance of bonds for like purposes, and without regard to the requirements, restrictions, limitations or other provisions contained in any other general, special or local law.

Acts 2010, ch. 1078, § 1.

7-90-122. Approval for public funding.

No state or local funds shall be expended by or on behalf of a medical school authority for a proposed project under this chapter nor shall bonds be issued by the state or bonds be guaranteed under § 7-90-114(b) on behalf of such project unless THEC, upon review of the proposed medical education program, specifically approves the program for public funding. The program shall not be approved for public funding unless THEC finds that such program is consistent with the purposes of this chapter, as expressed by the general assembly in § 7-90-102. In considering the program for such approval, THEC shall evaluate whether:

The medical education program conflicts with the master plan for public higher education developed pursuant to § 49-7-202(c)(1);

The medical education program is unnecessarily duplicative of other programs offered within the region of Tennessee for which the project is proposed;

There are sufficient potential students in the region or who would be attracted to the region to justify and maintain the operation of the medical education program;

The market demand for potential graduates of the medical education program is sufficient to support the number of graduates produced; and

The resources available in the region can sustain the medical education program.

In making its decision, THEC may also consider other criteria found in § 7-90-123(a) and information developed by the feasibility study required by § 7-90-123.

THEC approval is not required under this subsection (a), if the proposed project and medical education program will be funded exclusively with nonpublic funding and without the issuance of state bonds. A determination that THEC approval under this subsection (a) is not required shall not affect the requirements of § 7-90-123.

THEC shall have the authority to contract with another entity to perform the evaluation required by this part, the cost of which shall be the sole responsibility of the authority or the municipality or municipalities creating the authority.

The authority shall have a right to appeal THEC's action made pursuant to this section to the chancery court of Davidson County. Any such appeal shall be heard by the court de novo.

The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall not approve a state bond issue under § 7-90-112(f) until the comptroller or the comptroller's designee has received and examined the approval of the associated medical education program by THEC pursuant to subsection (a).

All state funds to be expended for a project of a medical school authority shall be specifically appropriated by reference to such project in the general appropriations act and such funds shall only be expended in accordance with the provisions of such act.

Acts 2010, ch. 1078, § 1.

7-90-123. Approval of project.

Notwithstanding any language in this chapter to the contrary, subsequent to initiation by an authority of a project or prior to acting upon any inducement or commitment related to such proposed project, the authority shall, with respect to each proposed project, make an application to THEC for THEC approval of the project and any debt issuance following THEC's review of a feasibility study relative to the need for the proposed medical education program described in the application and, if debt is to be issued, the capacity of the proposed project and the associated medical education program to pay the principal, interest and costs of issuance of any debt to be incurred. THEC shall develop a policy specifying any information, documents or data that will be required in making an application required by this section, which shall include, but not be limited to:

The type of medical education program that will be offered, to include the specific degree or degrees to be awarded;

The anticipated number of students to be served by the proposed project for each degree being offered;

Conceptual plans and cost estimates related to the facility to house the proposed medical education program;

A copy of any known feasibility study or studies related to the proposed project;

Information to ensure that the medical education program will not negatively impact an existing institution in the state or region of the same or similar type or with the same or similar mission;

A copy of the business plan for operation of the medical education program;

Assurances that such institution will seek and attain appropriate programmatic and institutional accreditations;

A detailed description of how the proposed medical education program fits into the state's higher education master plan along with any relevant supporting information and documentation pertaining to the project; and

Information pertaining to the proposed fiscal operations of the proposed program, and the proposed structure and terms of the financing.

THEC shall have the authority to contract with another entity to perform the feasibility study required by this part, the cost of which, including the reasonable costs of THEC, shall be the responsibility of the authority.

A copy of the information specified in subsection (a) with respect to the feasibility study shall be furnished to the comptroller of the treasury which shall furnish to the authority, THEC and any municipality granting a pledge of revenues or full faith and credit, written comments on the structure of the proposed debt financing and, if the comptroller of the treasury desires to do so, comments on the capacity of the proposed project to pay the debt service. The reasonable costs of the comptroller of the treasury in reviewing and analyzing the information furnished to the comptroller and in preparing comments thereon shall be the responsibility of the authority.

The authority may not approve the project, or the issuance of debt in connection therewith, unless and until the authority receives written approval of THEC following THEC's receipt and review of a written feasibility study performed pursuant to this section which finds that the project is consistent with the state's higher education master plan and, if debt is to be issued, that the proposed project has the capacity to pay the principal, interest and costs of issuance of the debt to be incurred and which finds feasibility in compliance with the factors in subsection (a).

Acts 2010, ch. 1078, § 1.

7-90-124. Project subject to capital outlay priority policies of higher education governing board.

Notwithstanding any other language in this chapter to the contrary, if the proposed project includes a medical education program affiliated with a public institution of higher learning, then such project shall be subject to the capital outlay priority policies of the respective higher education governing board with respect to such public institution and also such policies of THEC.

Acts 2010, ch. 1078, § 1.